New York, session 2025-2026, S10454.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 265-a of the public health law, as 2 amended by section 1 of part M of chapter 57 of the laws of 2021, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. The empire state stem cell board ("board"), comprised of a funding 5 committee and an ethics committee, both of which shall be chaired by the 6 commissioner, is hereby created within the department for the purpose of 7 administering the empire state stem cell trust fund ("fund"), created 8 pursuant to section ninety-nine-p of the state finance law. The board is 9 hereby empowered, subject to annual appropriations and other funding 10 authorized or made available, to make grants to basic, applied, transla- 11 tional or other research and development activities that will advance 12 scientific discoveries in fields related to stem cell biology[; 13 provided, however, that the board shall not make any grants on or after 14 April first, two thousand twenty-one]. 15 § 2. Section 4 of part H of chapter 58 of the laws of 2007 amending 16 the public health law, the public officers law and the state finance law 17 relating to establishing the empire state stem cell board, as amended by 18 section 2 of part M of chapter 57 of the laws of 2021, is amended to 19 read as follows: 20 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 21 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2007 [and shall 22 expire and be deemed repealed December 31, 2025]. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 24 have been in full force and effect on and after December 30, 2025. 25 Notwithstanding the provisions of article 5 of the general construction EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00987-02-6 S. 10454 2 1 law, the provisions of paragraph (u) of subdivision 1 of section 17 of 2 the public officers law, section 99-p of the state finance law and the 3 provisions of title 5-A of article 2 of the public health law, as 4 amended by section one of this act, are hereby revived and shall contin- 5 ue in full force and effect as such provisions existed on December 30, 6 2025.